Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.320

Motor vehicle.

(1) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that is self-propelled or a vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails.

(2) "Motor vehicle" includes:

(a) A neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.357;

(b) A medium-speed electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.295; and

(c) A golf cart for the purposes of chapter 46.61 RCW.

(3) "Motor vehicle" excludes:

(a) An electric personal assistive mobility device;

(b) A power wheelchair;

(c) A golf cart, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section;

(d) A moped, for the purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW; and

(e) A personal delivery device as defined in RCW 46.75.010.

[ 2019 c 214 s 6; 2010 c 217 s 1; 2007 c 510 s 1. Prior: 2003 c 353 s 1; 2003 c 141 s 2; 2002 c 247 s 2; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.320; prior: 1959 c 49 s 33; 1955 c 384 s 10; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 214: See note following RCW 46.75.010.

Effective date—2007 c 510: "This act takes effect August 1, 2007." [ 2007 c 510 s 6.]

Effective date—2003 c 353: "This act takes effect August 1, 2003." [ 2003 c 353 s 12.]

Legislative review—2002 c 247: See note following RCW 46.04.1695.